Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.425

Interns—Effect of employment experience—Rights of reversion—Fringe benefits—Sick and vacation leave.

The director of financial management or the director's designee shall adopt rules to provide that:

(1) Successful completion of an internship under RCW 43.06.420 shall be considered as employment experience at the level at which the intern was placed;

(2) Persons leaving classified or exempt positions in state government in order to take an internship under RCW 43.06.420: (a) Have the right of reversion to the previous position at any time during the internship or upon completion of the internship; and (b) shall continue to receive all fringe benefits as if they had never left their classified or exempt positions;

(3) Participants in the undergraduate internship program who were not public employees prior to accepting a position in the program receive sick leave allowances commensurate with other state employees;

(4) Participants in the executive fellows program who were not public employees prior to accepting a position in the program receive sick and vacation leave allowances commensurate with other state employees.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 456; 2002 c 354 s 229; 1993 c 281 s 48; 1985 c 442 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Construction—Severability—1985 c 442: See notes following RCW 43.06.410.

State internship program—Positions exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW: RCW 41.06.088.